Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 19 Conduct of Election and Voting Equipment, and Supplies

17-19-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, except as otherwise required by the context:

“Candidate” means any individual who has qualified under law to have his or her name appear on the ballot for nomination for election or election to office;

“Computer ballot” means the paper ballot prepared by the office of the secretary of state for use in conjunction with the optical-scan precinct-count system or the voting equipment precinct-count system then in place and procured in accordance with this chapter;

“Public office” means any state, municipal, school, or district office or other position that is filled by popular election, except political party offices which shall mean any state, city, town, ward, or representative or senatorial district committee office of a political party or delegate to a political party convention, or any similar office;

A “Vote” shall be any mark made with the appropriate marking device within the ballot voting area between the head and tail of the arrow or in the oval as indicated on the computer ballot next to the candidate, write-in candidate, or question, as is applicable, for whom the voter casts his or her ballot, except as provided in §

17-20-24

;

“Voting equipment” means an optical-scan precinct-count voting system or the voting equipment precinct-count system then in place and procured in accordance with this chapter, related memory device, all related hardware and software, accessible voting systems required by federal law, and voting booths;

“Warden” includes moderator and vice versa; and

“Write-in candidate” means any individual receiving votes or seeking election to office by virtue of having irregular ballots cast for him or her pursuant to §

17-19-31

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 2; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; P.L. 1948, ch. 2151, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2004, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 483, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 201, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 190, § 1.

17-19-2.
Voting equipment.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, voting equipment that has been procured by the department of administration according to the provisions of this chapter shall be used in all state, city, or town elections, including elections at which amendments to the constitution of the state are submitted to the electors for approval. Until such voting equipment is procured by the department of administration pursuant to the specifications provided by the office of the secretary of state, voting equipment previously acquired by the department of administration according to the provisions of this chapter in effect at that time shall continue to be used in all state, city, or town elections, including elections at which amendments to the constitution of the state are submitted to the electors for approval.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, §§ 1, 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, §§ 1, 23; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; P.L. 1956, ch. 3755, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

17-19-2

,

17-19-3

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2015, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 201, § 3.

17-19-2.1.
New voting technology.

In the event the department of administration purchases new voting equipment and services in accordance with §

17-19-3

, then any reference in title 17 to optical-scan equipment shall be deemed to refer to the voting equipment then purchased, whether such voting equipment utilizes optical-scan technology or not.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 201, § 3.

17-19-3.
Voting equipment and services — Specifications.

The office of secretary of state shall develop, from time to time, and, in coordination with the general assembly for the purpose of funding procurement, submit specifications to the department of administration that the department of administration shall utilize in procuring voting equipment, voting systems, and services related thereto in accordance with this chapter and chapter 2 of title 37 of the general laws. These specifications and requests for proposals for the options of purchasing, leasing to own, or renting precinct-count voting systems that utilize technologies, methods, and equipment considered reasonable best practices for the state and in compliance with all laws, and for a full-service contract for such voting systems, shall be constructed and shall operate in a manner that meets the following minimum requirements:

It shall enable the voter to:

Mark his or her ballot and cast his or her vote in secrecy;

Vote for all candidates of political parties or organizations, and for, or against, questions as submitted;

Vote for as many persons for an office as the voter is lawfully entitled to vote for, but no more; and

Vote on any question the voter may have the right to vote on;

It shall prevent the voter from voting for the same person more than once for the same office;

The voting equipment shall allow the voter to cast one vote, thereby allowing the voter to vote for all the presidential electors of a party by a clear and unambiguous means; provided, that means shall be furnished by which the voter can cast a vote in part for the candidates for presidential electors of one party, and in part for those of one or more other parties, or in part or in whole, for persons not nominated by any party;

The precinct-counting system shall meet the following specifications:

Vote counting, including absentee ballots, shall be performed through the use of automated electronic equipment;

All vote counting shall be performed on equipment supplied as part of the bid. The system shall not require the use of non-supplied equipment to count ballots or tabulate results;

There shall be privacy enclosures in which a voter may mark his or her ballot or otherwise cast his or her vote in secret;

There shall be a device located in each polling place that can record the vote count and tally the vote count in that polling place and that can produce a printed tally of all races contained on said ballot in human, readable form. The device shall automatically print a “zero report” at the beginning of the day when the device is activated. The device that receives ballots for counting shall have an external counter indicating the number of ballots received. The actual vote tally shall be capable of being performed only by election officials and shall not be visible during the actual voting process. Each recording device shall ensure the security of voted ballots and ease of access;

As part of the voting process, there shall be created a physical ballot showing the votes cast by an individual voter that is capable of being hand counted so that electronic-recorded device totals can be checked for accuracy;

There shall be a device at each polling place to receive the physical audit trail of ballots cast and that shall securely store the ballots and have the capability of restricting access to the ballots only to authorize officials;

In the event of loss of electrical power, the polling place vote count shall be stored on an ongoing basis in media that will retain the count of the votes cast to that point in time for a period of no less than five (5) years;

The polling place vote counts shall be stored on a stable media that may be easily transported and that may be accessed and counted by an electronic device so that state, city, and/or town vote totals can be electronically calculated by combining individual polling place totals. It shall not be necessary to enter individual polling place totals by, and into, a central computer or device for the purpose of producing the state, city, and/or town totals, but rather the electronic media on which the polling place totals are stored shall be directly readable and accessible by a regional or central device;

There shall be a device that has the capability to electronically read the storage device upon which the individual polling place totals are stored and that shall produce a combined total for all races, which total can be printed in easily readable and legible form in a format prescribed by the state board of elections;

The system provided shall allow the secretary of state to have the capability to design the ballot format;

The system shall provide a capability for the state, without the use of outside services, to set up and prepare the counting devices to total an election; and

The system must be capable of receiving voted ballots without counting when without power and must provide for securely storing uncounted ballots;

The following minimum equipment shall be required for the state:

There shall be a minimum number of units to permit counting to be conducted in each polling place within the state with a reserve of equipment on hand;

There shall be a sufficient number of voting booths for each precinct to accommodate voters as determined in this title;

The number of polling place units and voting booths must be sufficient to permit the election to run smoothly without excessive waiting of voters;

If there is an increase in the number of polling places statewide during the term of the contract, the vendor will supply additional polling place units and voting booths at a cost proportional to the cost of the initial units pro rated for the balance of the agreement years;

There shall be high-speed, absentee vote tabulating equipment. These tabulators, as a whole, must be capable of counting absentee ballots at a reasonable best practices rate. The tabulators shall utilize the same ballots used in the polling place;

This system shall have the following capabilities in connection with the counting of ballots and producing results:

This system shall be able to read the media from the polling place units on which polling place results are stored and shall be able to compile polling place results producing a ballot total for each race; and

This system shall be capable of producing and printing out ballot totals on a polling-place-by-polling-place basis for each race, and shall be capable of producing a final total and subtotals of all races from all races and polling places in the state. All totals must be able to be produced at any time, based upon the number of polling places counted up to that point in time, and these printout results shall state the number of precincts counted and the percentage of precincts reporting;

There shall be all equipment necessary to program the system and erase the memory devices;

Reasonable best-practices tabulating equipment shall be located in each of the thirty-nine (39) local boards of canvassers and the central tabulation equipment shall be located at the state board of elections. The state board of elections, in conjunction with the service contract vendor, no less than thirty (30) days prior to an election, shall test the tabulation system to be utilized for the election and determine whether regional and/or central tabulation is adequate, and if regional tabulation is required, so implement it. The tabulation system shall have the following capabilities in connection with the counting of ballots and producing results:

This system shall be able to read the media from the polling place units on which polling place results are stored and shall be able to compile polling place results producing a ballot total for each race;

This system shall be capable of producing and printing out ballot totals on a polling-place-by-polling-place basis for each race and shall be capable of producing a final total and subtotal of all races from all races and polling places in the state;

All totals must be able to be produced at any time based upon the number of polling places counted up to that point in time, and the printout results shall state the number of precincts counted and the percentage of precincts reporting; and

This system shall be capable of transferring information gathered from the precincts and, if regional and/or central tabulation sites are utilized, the system shall be capable of transferring information gathered at any regional or central sites utilized by the thirty-nine (39) local boards of canvassers;

All necessary programming and accumulation software shall be provided to run the election system in accordance with the required specifications as well as all necessary and required modules. Any software updates during the term of the agreement shall not be charged to the state;

The vendor of the precinct-count system shall provide written proof of compliance with federal standards then in place and administered by the designated federal agency or organization from an independent testing company and this written proof must be on file with the office of the secretary of state and the state board of elections;

The vendor shall also provide the following information to be included in the vendor’s bid proposal:

An audited financial statement covering the previous five (5) years, and if the vendor is not the manufacturer of the equipment, both the agent and manufacturer must submit an audited financial statement covering the previous five (5) years with the bid;

In the event that either the vendor, agent, or manufacturer has been in existence for less than five (5) years, that entity must submit an audited financial statement for each and every full year that they have been in existence;

Proof of experience in the field of elections including, but not limited to, years of experience in this field and experience with a jurisdiction having the same needs as the state of Rhode Island; and

Names and addresses of the support organizations that will provide support of all equipment.

The full-service plan shall include the following services, but, at the discretion of the office of the secretary of state, shall not be limited to the following services:

Computer coding and layout of all ballots to be used in each election under contract, including the printing of the ballot and the preparation of the ballot-reading device to ensure that the ballots are compatible with the ballot-reading device. Subsequent thereto, the state board of elections shall be responsible for the following:

Testing of each unit for logic and accuracy;

Testing of each programmed memory device;

Set up of each precinct-count unit at each polling place;

Maintenance of all precinct-count units;

Training of poll workers;

On-site election night staff at the central tabulation location and any other locations as may be determined by the state board to receive and transmit election results;

On-site election day field technicians to respond to repair calls;

Providing the following equipment and supplies:

Secrecy covers for voted ballots;

Demonstration ballots;

Precision-cut shell program ballots ready for printing with timing marks;

Marking pens;

Ballot transfer cases;

Envelopes for mailing and receiving absentee ballots; and

Printer ribbons, paper tape rolls, and seals.

Any bid proposal by an offeror for a precinct-count system and a full-service agreement for a precinct-count system that does not conform in all respects to the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1) — (b)(9)(vii) of this section may be accepted by the office of the secretary of state with the consent of the department of administration. The office of the secretary of state shall memorialize the acceptance of any bid proposal that does not conform with the requirements of subsections (a)(1) — (b)(9)(vii) of this section in each instance of such non-conformance.

The office of the secretary of state periodically shall conduct a review of the election system, provide a report to the general assembly, and shall be responsible for establishing minimum requirements and specifications for the procurement of voting equipment and services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-4

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2014, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 201, § 3.

17-19-3.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 51, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 39; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 39. The repeal by chapter 83 is effective June 23, 1999, and the repeal by chapter 130 is effective June 28, 1999. For present comparable provisions, see §

17-19-3.2

.

17-19-3.2.
Polling place accessibility for voters who are disabled or elderly.

Every polling place shall be situated in a building that can be entered and exited by persons who are disabled or elderly.

“Persons who are disabled” for the purpose of this section means a serious impairment of mobility.

“Elderly” as used in this section means a person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older.

The state board of elections shall establish guidelines as to the accessibility of buildings to voters who are disabled or elderly. The state board of elections is empowered to grant, upon the application of the board of canvassers, an exception permitting it to maintain a polling place in a nonconforming building. An exception shall only be granted when the board of canvassers demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the board of elections, that there is no public building within the voting district which meets the requirements of this section or which can be brought into compliance by a reasonable expenditure of funds. If a conforming building is unavailable within the voting district, the board of elections shall provide to the board of canvassers an alternative method or an alternative location outside the voting district for persons who are disabled or elderly and request in advance of the election an alternative means of casting their ballot on election day.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 369, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 40; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 40.

17-19-3.3.
Telephones at polling places.

Every polling place shall have a telephone available for the use of any election official for the purpose of carrying out his or her official functions and duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 177, § 1.

17-19-3.4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 129, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 63, effective July 6, 2001.

17-19-3.5 — 17-19-3.15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 129; § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 25. § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 35, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 75, effective July 7, 2000.

17-19-4.
Voting booths and optical scan precinct count units — Number to be furnished.

For each voting district and for each town not divided into voting districts, at least one precinct count unit shall be prepared and delivered by the state board or its designee.

At each voting place, both in cities and in towns, at least one voting booth shall be furnished for every one hundred seventy-five (175) qualified electors, whose names are upon the voting list used at the voting place and entitled to use the machines, as certified to the state board based on the voting list certified as a result of the final canvass.

In making the calculation required by this section, voters whose names are on the inactive list of voters shall not be included.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 5; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3203, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-5

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 8; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2017, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 113, § 1.

17-19-4.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 8; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 17; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 17, effective January 1, 1997.

17-19-4.2.
Moderator request — Computerized voting machines.

Upon request of a moderator charged with conducting a municipal or regional school district financial meeting, the board of elections will furnish each meeting to be conducted with one computerized voting machine per year, and voting booths and ballots marked “yes” and “no” at the state’s expense. The request shall declare the number of requested ballots and the number of anticipated voters. The request shall be delivered to the board of elections no later than fifteen (15) days prior to the meeting. The board of elections shall determine the need for additional computerized machines and that cost shall be borne by the municipality or school district.

If a municipality or school district holds more than one financial meeting in the same calendar year, the municipality or school district shall bear the cost of any computerized machines, voting booths, and ballots furnished for use at any additional financial meetings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 432, § 2.

17-19-5.
Printing and furnishing of computer ballots.

The computer ballots to be used at any election shall be printed and furnished at the expense of the state by the secretary of state and turned over to the state board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 11; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 6; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3203, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-8

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-6.
Ballot — Arrangement.

In all cases where optical scan precinct count units are to be used for any election, the secretary of state shall prepare a diagram of the computer ballot to be used at the election. The diagram shall determine the manner and order in which the ballot shall be arranged, and the diagram shall, on the day of any election, be in the possession of the warden and available for public inspection. The diagram shall be a copy of the actual computer ballot to be voted at the polling place.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 10; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 5; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-6.1.
Local questions on the ballot.

In all circumstances where local questions are to be printed on the ballot, they shall be printed on a distinctive colored background. The first question shall be designated by the numeral I, and additional questions shall follow numbered so that all questions submitted to the electors of the city/town shall be numbered consecutively; provided, that whenever there are propositions of amendment of the Constitution or any public question of statewide impact on the ballot, the statewide questions shall be listed on the ballot numbered consecutively starting with the numeral I, and the local questions shall follow starting with the first available number and shall be numbered consecutively.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 236, § 1.

17-19-7.
Local candidates and questions — Certification — Ballots.

The local board of each city or town shall certify to the secretary of state, not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. of the third (3rd) day following the last day for the holding of the primary held pursuant to the provisions of chapter 15 of this title, preceding any regular city or town election to be held on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in any year, or not later than twenty-nine (29) days before any regular city or town election held at any time other than on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in any year, or not later than twenty-nine (29) days before any special city or town election, the offices to be voted for at the election, the names of the candidates for each office and the party name under which the respective candidates were nominated, and any other information necessary to enable the secretary of state to prepare ballots uniform in size, type, color, and appearance with those prepared by the secretary for the state election, and in like manner the local board shall certify to the secretary of state, not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the ninetieth (90th) day preceding any regular city or town election to be held on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in any year, or not later than fifty (50) days before any regular city or town election held at any time other than on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in any year, or not later than fifty (50) days before any special city or town election, a copy of each question to be submitted to the electors of the city or town so that suitable ballots may be prepared and furnished for the election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 11; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 6; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3203, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 4; P.L. 1991, ch. 277, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 1999, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 359, § 1.

17-19-7.1.
Listing of at-large candidates.

In case of a vote for members of the council or school committee of any city or town, in which the office or offices to be filled are to be elected on an at-large basis, and whether the election is a partisan, nonpartisan, primary, general, or special election, the names for the office or offices shall be listed on the ballot in such fashion that no more than one name for an office shall be displayed on the same horizontal line; provided, that candidates for nonpartisan election in the cities of Newport, Pawtucket, and Woonsocket, and candidates for partisan election in the town of North Providence, may be listed on the same horizontal line.

In no event shall the voting equipment be prepared to prevent further voting for an office or officer until the elector has cast as many votes as there are separate offices to be filled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 252, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-7.2.
Names of candidates.

In all elections, the names of candidates shall be printed on ballots as they appear on the voting list, notwithstanding that the candidate may have signed his or her declaration of candidacy other than as the candidate’s name appears on the voting list.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 389, § 3; P.L. 1990, 285, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-8.
Ballots — Form.

All ballots provided under this chapter shall be printed in black ink on clear, white material in plain, clear type. Upon the ballot for questions, the statement of the question may be abbreviated to meet the requirements of the space provided, and shall be printed in type that can be easily read, with the words “yes” or “no” or “approved” and “reject”, whichever may be required for the voter to indicate the voter’s vote for or against any question.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 11; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 6; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3203, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-9

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-8.1.
Ballots for voters who are blind, visually impaired, or disabled.

Any voter who is blind or visually impaired or disabled is eligible to request a special ballot for voting by mail ballot. Special mail ballots are available in braille or tactile format.

Requests must be made in writing to the local board of canvassers where the person is registered to vote or through the electronic voter registration portal established by §§

17-20-2.3

and

17-20-8

at least twenty-one (21) days before the election for which the voter is requesting the special ballot. In addition, the request will be valid for all elections held during the calendar year in which the request was received and in which the voter is eligible to participate. Applicants must also file the appropriate mail ballot application as required by chapter 20 of this title for each election in which they wish to participate.

The office of the secretary of state shall prepare and provide the appropriate form, which shall be available at local boards and upon request from the office of the secretary of state. The voter may also choose to submit his or her request in writing without using the form provided, as long as the communication contains all of the required information. The request shall include the following information:

The name and registered address of the voter;

A daytime telephone number;

An indication of whether this request is for the entire calendar year or only for the next upcoming election;

The voter’s political party affiliation, if the request for a special ballot is also for primaries; and

Indicate the special ballot format.

All requests received by local boards must be processed and forwarded to the office of the secretary of state within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt. The secretary of state shall maintain a list of all persons requesting special braille or tactile mail ballots and must forward a copy of the list to the state board of elections at least eighteen (18) days before the date of any election.

The state board may adopt rules and regulations for the procedure for the manual reproduction of voted ballots, when necessary, and the tabulation of braille and tactile mail ballots.

The office of the secretary of state shall be responsible for the preparation and distribution of special braille and tactile mail ballots. Whenever possible, the secretary of state shall prepare the braille or tactile mail ballot so that the voted ballot can be read by the tabulation equipment, rather than being manually reproduced by election officials onto a machine readable ballot.

The office of the secretary of state may adopt rules and regulations setting forth the procedure for the preparation and distribution of the braille and tactile mail ballots.

The office of the secretary of state shall prepare and publish a guide describing the types of ballots available and the manner in which each ballot can be voted. This guide shall be revised whenever the types of ballots available are updated. This guide shall be available in print, braille, audio, or other accessible formats.

The office of the secretary of state shall establish a special braille and tactile ballot program for voters who are blind or visually impaired. The office of the secretary of state shall expand the special ballot service to other voters with disabilities, as feasible, as determined by the secretary of state, and incorporate other accessible formats as technology and resources allow.

In accordance with the Help America Vote Act of 2002, the voting system at each polling place shall be accessible for individuals with disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for access and participation as for other voters.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 87, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 96, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 4, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 4, effective June 7, 2022.

17-19-8.2.
State-of-the-art voting technology.

The office of the secretary of state when implementing the provisions of §

17-19-3

shall specify to the extent reasonably available state-of-the-art voting equipment that can accommodate voters who are blind, visually impaired, or are otherwise disabled, in order to afford all voters, regardless of abilities, an opportunity to cast their ballot privately and independently.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 201, § 3.

17-19-9.
Party emblems.

The emblem of the democratic party shall be the representation of a star. The emblem of the republican party shall be the representation of an eagle. The emblem of any political organization qualifying as a “political party,” as defined in this title, shall be selected by the state chairperson of the party; provided, that the emblem shall be entirely different for each political party and may be any appropriate symbol, but neither the coat of arms, or seal of any state or of the United States, the national or state flag, any religious emblem or symbol, the seal of any society, the portrait or likeness of any person, or the representation of a coin or of the currency of the United States, shall be chosen as an emblem. Whenever any emblem has been selected and used upon official ballots for any political party, it shall not thereafter be used for any other political party.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 6; P.L. 1948, ch. 2151, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-10

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2014, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 280, § 1.

Partial Slate.

The fact that a political group does not nominate candidates for all offices does not prevent its candidates from being listed under a party emblem. Cahir v. Cote,

72 R.I. 188

, 49 A.2d 316,

1946 R.I. LEXIS 58

(1946); Moses v. Cote,

72 R.I. 196

, 49 A.2d 319,

1946 R.I. LEXIS 59

(1946) (Decided under prior law).

17-19-9.1.
Ballot arrangement — Independent candidates.

In all state elections at which candidates for public office are to be elected, some of whom are candidates of a political party and some of whom are independent candidates as defined in §

17-1-2(4)

, all independent candidates for the same public office shall be listed on the ballot, in the vertical column below the title of the office they seek, following the listing of the political party candidates for the office and in an order chosen by lottery; provided, that any independent candidate shall be entitled to have appear on the ballot, in small print to the right his or her name, the name of any political principle, movement, or organization with which the candidate wishes to be identified. The name of the political principle, movement, or organization must be identified on the declaration of candidacy, must contain not more than three (3) words, and must not include, in whole or in part, the name of any political party. If any declaration of candidacy does not contain the name of any political principle, movement, or organization, the word “independent” will appear in small print to the right the name of the candidate on the ballot. Except as provided in this section, the powers and duties of the secretary of state with respect to the preparation of the ballots shall not be affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 342, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-10.
Sample ballots — Contents — Distribution.

The secretary of state shall prepare a sample ballot that shall be a copy of the computer ballot to be used. The sample ballot shall clearly and briefly explain and illustrate the manner of casting a vote, of voting for candidates individually, and of voting upon questions. The secretary of state shall furnish a reasonable supply of sample ballots to the state board of elections, for public distribution upon request, and no fewer than three (3) of the sample ballots shall be furnished for each voting place.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 11; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 6; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3203, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-11

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-10

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2014, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 280, § 1.

17-19-10.1.
Training and community outreach.

In furtherance of the termination of the option of straight-party voting by means of a single mark in non-primary elections, the secretary of state shall, no later than thirty (30) days after the effective date of this section, conduct appropriate training and consultations with the state board of elections and local boards of canvassers as he or she may deem necessary in order for the proper administration of voting in the absence of the option of straight-party voting by means of a single mark. The secretary of state shall also conduct community outreach programs throughout the state, including, without limitation, the distribution of applicable materials to state and local libraries, in order to educate the public, including the elderly, with respect to the foregoing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 279, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 280, § 2.

17-19-11.
Election return forms — Contents.

The state board shall prepare and furnish, for each voting place at which machines are to be used, suitable forms on which the following information may be recorded for each machine in use:

The optical scan precinct count unit number;

The numbers of any serial seal or seals;

The voting place at which the optical scan precinct count unit is used;

The date of the election or primary at which the optical scan precinct count unit is used;

The number of names checked upon the voting list used at the election; and

The number of voters registered by the optical scan precinct count unit.

Space shall be left on the form in which the number of votes given for any person not a candidate at the election, and for what office, may be recorded. Spaces shall also be left for the signatures of the election inspector, the warden, clerk, and at least two (2) supervisors. The state board shall also furnish the necessary envelopes and adhesive labels required to be used in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Tapes printed from the optical scan precinct count unit indicating the number of votes registered by the unit for each candidate, and for what office, shall be attached to the election return form; tapes printed from the optical scan precinct count unit indicating the number of votes registered by the unit for and against each submitted question shall be attached to the election return form.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 11; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 6; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-12

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-12.
Delivery of election supplies.

All printed matter, stationery, and supplies required to be furnished by this chapter shall be delivered to or picked up by the proper officer as determined by the state board not later than 12:00 p.m. the day before the election for which they are to be used. Computer ballots to be used at each polling place, ballot transfer cases, marking pens, secrecy sleeves, and any other items related to the voting equipment shall be packaged by the state board and shall be delivered to or picked up by the proper officer as determined by the state board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 11; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 6; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-13

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2017, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 23, § 1.